North Carolina, session 2025, SB902.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. The Office of the State Auditor shall conduct a performance audit of
the Ferry Division of the Department of Transportation, which shall include all of the following:
(1) A financial audit of the Division's operations and maintenance spending and
budget practices.
(2) An evaluation of the Division's operations, capital project, and maintenance
activities, and suggestions for long-term strategies to maximize revenue and
reduce costs.
(3) An evaluation of the current route system and potential route and schedule
adjustments to maximize revenue and reduce costs.
(4) An evaluation of potential options to diversify revenue to support ferry capital
project needs and recoup operating costs.
(5) Other items the State Auditor deems relevant to evaluate.
SECTION 2. No later than October 1, 2026, the State Auditor shall provide a report
of the performance audit required by this act to the Joint Legislative Transportation Oversight
Committee and the Fiscal Research Division.
SECTION 3. This act is effective when it becomes law.
*S902-v-1*